Florida, session 2026, SB280.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 13 193.155, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 193.155âHomestead assessments.âHomestead property shall be 15 assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving 16 the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed 17 at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property 18 receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8) 19 apply. 20 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in this subsection or subsection 21 (8), property assessed under this section shall be assessed at 22 just value as of January 1 of the year following a change of 23 ownership; however, if ownership is acquired by a person 24 entitled to a homestead exemption and the acquired property had 25 an assessed value of less than $500,000 in the preceding year, 26 the propertyâs assessed value may not exceed 150 percent of its 27 assessed value in the preceding year. Thereafter, the annual 28 changes in the assessed value of the property are subject to the 29 limitations in subsections (1) and (2). For the purpose of this 30 section, a change of ownership means any sale, foreclosure, or 31 transfer of legal title or beneficial title in equity to any 32 person, except if any of the following apply: 33 1.âSubsequent to the change or transfer, the same person is 34 entitled to the homestead exemption as was previously entitled 35 and: 36 a.âThe transfer of title is to correct an error; 37 b.âThe transfer is between legal and equitable title or 38 equitable and equitable title and no additional person applies 39 for a homestead exemption on the property; 40 c.âThe change or transfer is by means of an instrument in 41 which the owner is listed as both grantor and grantee of the 42 real property and one or more other individuals are additionally 43 named as grantee. However, if any individual who is additionally 44 named as a grantee applies for a homestead exemption on the 45 property, the application is considered a change of ownership; 46 d.âThe change or transfer is by means of an instrument in 47 which the owner entitled to the homestead exemption is listed as 48 both grantor and grantee of the real property and one or more 49 other individuals, all of whom held title as joint tenants with 50 rights of survivorship with the owner, are named only as 51 grantors and are removed from the title; or 52 e.âThe person is a lessee entitled to the homestead 53 exemption under s. 196.041(1); 54 2.âLegal or equitable title is changed or transferred 55 between husband and wife, including a change or transfer to a 56 surviving spouse or a transfer due to a dissolution of marriage; 57 3.âThe transfer occurs by operation of law to the surviving 58 spouse or minor child or children under s. 732.401; 59 4.âUpon the death of the owner, the transfer is between the 60 owner and another who is a permanent resident and who is legally 61 or naturally dependent upon the owner; or 62 5.âThe transfer occurs with respect to a property where all 63 of the following apply: 64 a.âMultiple owners hold title as joint tenants with rights 65 of survivorship; 66 b.âOne or more owners were entitled to and received the 67 homestead exemption on the property; 68 c.âThe death of one or more owners occurs; and 69 d.âSubsequent to the transfer, the surviving owner or 70 owners previously entitled to and receiving the homestead 71 exemption continue to be entitled to and receive the homestead 72 exemption. 73 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect on the effective date 74 of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by SJR 278 75 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same 76 specific intent and purpose, if such amendment is approved at 77 the next general election or at an earlier special election 78 specifically authorized by law for that purpose.